Connecticut, session 2026, HB05318.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this
section:
(1) "Banking institution" has the same meaning as provided in section
36a-309 of the general statutes;
(2) "Candidate committee" has the same meaning as provided in
section 9-601 of the general statutes;
(3) "Committee banking account" means a consumer transaction
account used primarily for the purposes of a candidate committee, party
committee or political committee;
(4) "Connecticut credit union" has the same meaning as provided in
section 36a-2 of the general statutes;
(5) "Consumer transaction account" means a demand deposit
account, share draft account or similar account;
(6) "Exempt credit union" means a Connecticut credit union, federal
credit union or out-of-state credit union having total assets of less than
fifty million dollars;
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5318
(7) "Federal credit union" has the same meaning as provided in
section 36a-2 of the general statutes;
(8) "Out-of-state credit union" has the same meaning as provided in
section 36a-2 of the general statutes;
(9) "Party committee" has the same meaning as provided in section 9-
601 of the general statutes; and
(10) "Political committee" has the same meaning as provided in
section 9-601 of the general statutes.
(b) On and after October 1, 2026, each banking institution, other than
an exempt credit union, shall make committee banking accounts
available to candidate committees, party committees and political
committees.
(c) A committee banking account shall offer at least the following to
the depositor: (1) A debit card, (2) ATM in-network access, (3) deposits,
(4) check cashing for checks issued by the banking institution at which
the depositor holds the committee banking account, (5) electronic
monthly statements, (6) copies of cancelled checks, and (7) copies of
deposit slips. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a
banking institution to include additional enhanced account features,
such as preferred or incentive interest rates or rewards programs, with
a committee banking account.
(d) A banking institution shall allow a person to open a committee
banking account when the banking institution is presented with a State
Elections Enforcement Commission "Form 1", "Form 2" or "Form 3" that
(1) has been filed with the commission or a town clerk, and (2) is
accompanied by satisfactory proof of a federal employer identification
number.
(e) The Banking Commissioner shall, in the course of evaluating the
performance of a Connecticut bank or a Connecticut credit union in
meeting its obligations under part II of chapter 664a of the general
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5318
statutes, provide credit to such bank or credit union for offering a
committee banking account.
(f) The Banking Commissioner, in consultation with the State
Elections Enforcement Commission, may adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
carry out the purposes of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3